Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6044.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-70-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-70 entitled "THE
ONWARD WE LEARN SCHOLARSHIP ACT [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island
Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-70-5. Budget and appropriations.
The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums as it deems necessary as the
state’s share for the support and maintenance of the onward we learn scholarship program,
including operational and scholarship support, and the. Should funds remain from the enacted
budget in any fiscal year from the Rhode Island promise scholarship program after the community
college of Rhode Island has satisfied all eligible scholarships associated with chapter 107 of title
16 (“Rhode Island promise scholarship”), the office of the postsecondary commissioner is directed
to reimburse onward we learn for any scholarships that onward we learn has paid on behalf of its
students who have attended the community college of Rhode island in that respective fiscal year.
In addition, should funds remain from the enacted budget in any fiscal year from the Rhode Island
hope scholarship program after Rhode Island college has satisfied all eligible scholarships
associated with chapter 113 of title 16 (“Rhode Island hope scholarship pilot program act”), the
office of postsecondary commissioner is directed to reimburse onward we learn for any
scholarships that onward we learn has paid on behalf of its students who have attended Rhode
Island college in that respective fiscal year. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw
their orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the appropriations upon receipt by the

state controller of the proper voucher the office of the postsecondary commissioner may provide.
The office of the postsecondary commissioner shall present the voucher to the state controller no
later than the last day of the first month of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made and
this appropriation shall be remitted to the accounts of the onward we learn scholarship program by
the state treasurer no later than the last day of the second month of the fiscal year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002262
========
LC002262 - Page 2 of 3